Florida, session 2026, SB1084.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âParagraph (d) of subsection (4) of section 19 119.071, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 20 119.071âGeneral exemptions from inspection or copying of 21 public records.â 22 (4)âAGENCY PERSONNEL INFORMATION.â 23 (d)1.âFor purposes of this paragraph, the term: 24 a.ââHome addressesâ means the dwelling location at which an 25 individual resides and includes the physical address, mailing 26 address, street address, parcel identification number, plot 27 identification number, legal property description, neighborhood 28 name and lot number, GPS coordinates, and any other descriptive 29 property information that may reveal the home address. 30 b.ââJudicial assistantâ means a court employee assigned to 31 the following class codes: 8140, 8150, 8310, and 8320. 32 c.ââState attorneyâs office or Office of Statewide 33 Prosecution nonlegal support staffâ means an employee of a state 34 attorneyâs office or the Office of Statewide Prosecution 35 assigned to the following class codes: 6031, 6032, 6033, 6034, 36 6035, 6141, 6142, 6151, 6152, 6153, 6154, 6155, 6161, 6162, 37 6163, 6171, 6172, 6173, 6174, 6180, 6211, 6212, 6213, 6214, 38 6215, 6326, 6327, 6331, 6332, 6333, 6341, 6342, 6343, 6344, 39 6345, 6349, 6350, 6391, 6392, 6393, 6395, 6407, 6408, 6409, 40 6417, 6418, 6441, 6442, 6443, 6444, 6491, 6492, 6493, 6495, 41 6531, 6532, 6533, 6534, 6541, 6542, 6543, 6544, 6545, 6549, 42 6561, 6562, 6563, 6564, 6566, 6571, 6572, 6573, 6615, 6616, 43 6801, 6909, 6910, or 6911. 44 d.ââTelephone numbersâ includes home telephone numbers, 45 personal cellular telephone numbers, personal pager telephone 46 numbers, and telephone numbers associated with personal 47 communications devices. 48 2.a.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 49 and photographs of active or former sworn law enforcement 50 personnel or of active or former civilian personnel employed by 51 a law enforcement agency, including correctional and 52 correctional probation officers, personnel of the Department of 53 Children and Families whose duties include the investigation of 54 abuse, neglect, exploitation, fraud, theft, or other criminal 55 activities, personnel of the Department of Health whose duties 56 are to support the investigation of child abuse or neglect, and 57 personnel of the Department of Revenue or local governments 58 whose responsibilities include revenue collection and 59 enforcement or child support enforcement; the names, home 60 addresses, telephone numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and 61 places of employment of the spouses and children of such 62 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 63 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 64 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 65 Constitution. 66 b.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 67 and photographs of current or former nonsworn investigative 68 personnel of the Department of Financial Services whose duties 69 include the investigation of fraud, theft, workersâ compensation 70 coverage requirements and compliance, other related criminal 71 activities, or state regulatory requirement violations; the 72 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 73 places of employment of the spouses and children of such 74 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 75 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 76 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 77 Constitution. 78 c.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 79 and photographs of current or former nonsworn investigative 80 personnel of the Office of Financial Regulationâs Bureau of 81 Financial Investigations whose duties include the investigation 82 of fraud, theft, other related criminal activities, or state 83 regulatory requirement violations; the names, home addresses, 84 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 85 the spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and 86 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 87 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 88 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 89 d.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 90 and photographs of current or former firefighters certified in 91 compliance with s. 633.408; the names, home addresses, telephone 92 numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment 93 of the spouses and children of such firefighters; and the names 94 and locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 95 children of such firefighters are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 96 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 97 e.âThe home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone 98 numbers of current or former justices of the Supreme Court, 99 district court of appeal judges, circuit court judges, and 100 county court judges and current judicial assistants; the names, 101 home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of 102 employment of the spouses and children of current or former 103 justices and judges and current judicial assistants; and the 104 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 105 by the children of current or former justices and judges and of 106 current judicial assistants are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 107 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph 108 is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in 109 accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 110 2028, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment 111 by the Legislature. 112 f.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 113 and photographs of current or former state attorneys, assistant 114 state attorneys, statewide prosecutors, or assistant statewide 115 prosecutors, or current state attorneyâs office or Office of 116 Statewide Prosecution nonlegal support staff; the names, home 117 addresses, telephone numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and 118 places of employment of the spouses and children of current or 119 former state attorneys, assistant state attorneys, statewide 120 prosecutors, or assistant statewide prosecutors, or current 121 state attorneyâs office or Office of Statewide Prosecution 122 nonlegal support staff; and the names and locations of schools 123 and day care facilities attended by the children of current or 124 former state attorneys, assistant state attorneys, statewide 125 prosecutors, or assistant statewide prosecutors, or current 126 state attorneyâs office or Office of Statewide Prosecution 127 nonlegal support staff are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 128 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph 129 is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in 130 accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 131 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment 132 by the Legislature. 133 g.âThe home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone 134 numbers of general magistrates, special magistrates, judges of 135 compensation claims, administrative law judges of the Division 136 of Administrative Hearings, and child support enforcement 137 hearing officers; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 138 dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses and 139 children of general magistrates, special magistrates, judges of 140 compensation claims, administrative law judges of the Division 141 of Administrative Hearings, and child support enforcement 142 hearing officers; and the names and locations of schools and day 143 care facilities attended by the children of general magistrates, 144 special magistrates, judges of compensation claims, 145 administrative law judges of the Division of Administrative 146 Hearings, and child support enforcement hearing officers are 147 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 148 Constitution. 149 h.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 150 and photographs of current or former human resource, labor 151 relations, or employee relations directors, assistant directors, 152 managers, or assistant managers of any local government agency 153 or water management district whose duties include hiring and 154 firing employees, labor contract negotiation, administration, or 155 other personnel-related duties; the names, home addresses, 156 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 157 the spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and 158 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 159 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 160 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 161 i.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 162 and photographs of current or former code enforcement officers; 163 the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 164 and places of employment of the spouses and children of such 165 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 166 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 167 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 168 Constitution. 169 j.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, places of 170 employment, dates of birth, and photographs of current or former 171 guardians ad litem, as defined in s. 39.01; the names, home 172 addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of 173 employment of the spouses and children of such persons; and the 174 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 175 by the children of such persons are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 176 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 177 k.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 178 and photographs of current or former juvenile probation 179 officers, juvenile probation supervisors, detention 180 superintendents, assistant detention superintendents, juvenile 181 justice detention officers I and II, juvenile justice detention 182 officer supervisors, juvenile justice residential officers, 183 juvenile justice residential officer supervisors I and II, 184 juvenile justice counselors, juvenile justice counselor 185 supervisors, human services counselor administrators, senior 186 human services counselor administrators, rehabilitation 187 therapists, and social services counselors of the Department of 188 Juvenile Justice; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 189 dates of birth, and places of employment of spouses and children 190 of such personnel; and the names and locations of schools and 191 day care facilities attended by the children of such personnel 192 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 193 Constitution. 194 l.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 195 and photographs of current or former public defenders, assistant 196 public defenders, criminal conflict and civil regional counsel, 197 and assistant criminal conflict and civil regional counsel; the 198 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 199 places of employment of the spouses and children of current or 200 former public defenders, assistant public defenders, criminal 201 conflict and civil regional counsel, and assistant criminal 202 conflict and civil regional counsel; and the names and locations 203 of schools and day care facilities attended by the children of 204 current or former public defenders, assistant public defenders, 205 criminal conflict and civil regional counsel, and assistant 206 criminal conflict and civil regional counsel are exempt from s. 207 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 208 m.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 209 and photographs of current or former investigators or inspectors 210 of the Department of Business and Professional Regulation; the 211 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 212 places of employment of the spouses and children of such current 213 or former investigators and inspectors; and the names and 214 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 215 children of such current or former investigators and inspectors 216 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 217 Constitution. 218 n.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, and dates of 219 birth of county tax collectors; the names, home addresses, 220 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 221 the spouses and children of such tax collectors; and the names 222 and locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 223 children of such tax collectors are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 224 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 225 o.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 226 and photographs of current or former personnel of the Department 227 of Health whose duties include, or result in, the determination 228 or adjudication of eligibility for social security disability 229 benefits, the investigation or prosecution of complaints filed 230 against health care practitioners, or the inspection of health 231 care practitioners or health care facilities licensed by the 232 Department of Health; the names, home addresses, telephone 233 numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses 234 and children of such personnel; and the names and locations of 235 schools and day care facilities attended by the children of such 236 personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 237 the State Constitution. 238 p.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 239 and photographs of current or former impaired practitioner 240 consultants who are retained by an agency or current or former 241 employees of an impaired practitioner consultant whose duties 242 result in a determination of a personâs skill and safety to 243 practice a licensed profession; the names, home addresses, 244 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 245 the spouses and children of such consultants or their employees; 246 and the names and locations of schools and day care facilities 247 attended by the children of such consultants or employees are 248 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 249 Constitution. 250 q.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 251 and photographs of current or former emergency medical 252 technicians or paramedics certified under chapter 401; the 253 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 254 places of employment of the spouses and children of such 255 emergency medical technicians or paramedics; and the names and 256 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 257 children of such emergency medical technicians or paramedics are 258 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 259 Constitution. 260 r.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 261 and photographs of current or former personnel employed in an 262 agencyâs office of inspector general or internal audit 263 department whose duties include auditing or investigating waste, 264 fraud, abuse, theft, exploitation, or other activities that 265 could lead to criminal prosecution or administrative discipline; 266 the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 267 and places of employment of spouses and children of such 268 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 269 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 270 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 271 Constitution. 272 s.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 273 and photographs of current or former directors, managers, 274 supervisors, nurses, and clinical employees of an addiction 275 treatment facility; the home addresses, telephone numbers, 276 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the 277 spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and 278 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 279 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 280 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. For purposes of this 281 sub-subparagraph, the term âaddiction treatment facilityâ means 282 a county government, or agency thereof, that is licensed 283 pursuant to s. 397.401 and provides substance abuse prevention, 284 intervention, or clinical treatment, including any licensed 285 service component described in s. 397.311(27). 286 t.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 287 and photographs of current or former directors, managers, 288 supervisors, and clinical employees of a child advocacy center 289 that meets the standards of s. 39.3035(2) and fulfills the 290 screening requirement of s. 39.3035(3), and the members of a 291 Child Protection Team as described in s. 39.303 whose duties 292 include supporting the investigation of child abuse or sexual 293 abuse, child abandonment, child neglect, and child exploitation 294 or to provide services as part of a multidisciplinary case 295 review team; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 296 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the 297 spouses and children of such personnel and members; and the 298 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 299 by the children of such personnel and members are exempt from s. 300 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 301 u.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, places of 302 employment, dates of birth, and photographs of current or former 303 staff and domestic violence advocates, as defined in s. 304 90.5036(1)(b), of domestic violence centers certified by the 305 Department of Children and Families under chapter 39; the names, 306 home addresses, telephone numbers, places of employment, dates 307 of birth, and photographs of the spouses and children of such 308 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 309 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 310 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 311 Constitution. 312 v.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 313 and photographs of current or former inspectors or investigators 314 of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services; the 315 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 316 places of employment of the spouses and children of current or 317 former inspectors or investigators; and the names and locations 318 of schools and day care facilities attended by the children of 319 current or former inspectors or investigators are exempt from s. 320 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This 321 sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review 322 Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on 323 October 2, 2028, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through 324 reenactment by the Legislature. 325 w.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 326 and photographs of current county attorneys, assistant county 327 attorneys, deputy county attorneys, city attorneys, assistant 328 city attorneys, and deputy city attorneys; the names, home 329 addresses, telephone numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and 330 places of employment of the spouses and children of current 331 county attorneys, assistant county attorneys, deputy county 332 attorneys, city attorneys, assistant city attorneys, and deputy 333 city attorneys; and the names and locations of schools and day 334 care facilities attended by the children of current county 335 attorneys, assistant county attorneys, deputy county attorneys, 336 city attorneys, assistant city attorneys, and deputy city 337 attorneys are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 338 the State Constitution. This exemption does not apply to a 339 county attorney, assistant county attorney, deputy county 340 attorney, city attorney, assistant city attorney, or deputy city 341 attorney who qualifies as a candidate for election to public 342 office. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open Government 343 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 344 repealed on October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and saved from 345 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 346 x.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 347 and photographs of current or former commissioners of the 348 Florida Gaming Control Commission; the names, home addresses, 349 telephone numbers, dates of birth, photographs, and places of 350 employment of the spouses and children of such current or former 351 commissioners; and the names and locations of schools and day 352 care facilities attended by the children of such current or 353 former commissioners are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), 354 Art. I of the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is 355 subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance 356 with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2029, 357 unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the 358 Legislature. 359 y.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 360 and photographs of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy 361 clerks of the circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court 362 personnel; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates 363 of birth, and places of employment of the spouses and children 364 of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy clerks of the 365 circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court personnel; and the 366 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 367 by the children of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy 368 clerks of the circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court 369 personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 370 the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the 371 Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 372 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and 373 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 374 z.(I)âAs used in this sub-subparagraph, the term: 375 (A)ââCongressional memberâ means a person who is elected to 376 serve as a member of the United States House of Representatives 377 or is elected or appointed to serve as a member of the United 378 States Senate. 379 (B)ââPartial home addressâ means the dwelling location at 380 which an individual resides and includes the physical address, 381 mailing address, street address, parcel identification number, 382 plot identification number, legal property description, 383 neighborhood name and lot number, GPS coordinates, and any other 384 descriptive property information that may reveal the partial 385 home address, except for the city and zip code. 386 (C)ââPublic officerâ means a person who holds one of the 387 following offices: Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Chief 388 Financial Officer, Attorney General, Agriculture Commissioner, 389 state representative, state senator, property appraiser, 390 supervisor of elections, school superintendent, school board 391 member, mayor, city commissioner, or county commissioner. 392 (II)âThe following information is exempt from s. 119.07(1) 393 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution: 394 (A)âThe partial home addresses of a current congressional 395 member or public officer and his or her spouse or adult child. 396 (B)âThe telephone numbers of a current congressional member 397 or public officer and his or her spouse or adult child. 398 (C)âThe name, home addresses, telephone numbers, and date 399 of birth of a minor child of a current congressional member or 400 public officer and the name and location of the school or day 401 care facility attended by the minor child. 402 (III)âThis sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open 403 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and 404 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2030, unless reviewed and 405 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 406 3.a.âAn agency that is the custodian of the information 407 specified in subparagraph 2. and that is not the employer of the 408 officer, employee, justice, judge, or other person specified in 409 subparagraph 2. must maintain the exempt status of that 410 information only if the officer, employee, justice, judge, other 411 person, or employing agency of the designated employee submits a 412 written and notarized request for maintenance of the exemption 413 to the custodial agency. The request must state under oath the 414 statutory basis for the individualâs exemption request and 415 confirm the individualâs status as a party eligible for exempt 416 status. 417 b.âAn agency that is the custodian of information specified 418 in sub-subparagraph 2.z. and that is not the employer of the 419 congressional member, public officer, or other person specified 420 in sub-subparagraph 2.z. must maintain the exempt status of that 421 information only if an individual requests the maintenance of an 422 exemption pursuant to sub-subparagraph 2.z. on the basis of 423 eligibility as a current congressional member or public officer 424 and his or her spouse or child submits, as part of the written 425 and notarized request required by sub-subparagraph a., the date 426 of the congressional memberâs or public officerâs election or 427 appointment to public office, the date on which that office is 428 next subject to election, and, if applicable, the date on which 429 the current congressional memberâs or public officerâs minor 430 child reaches the age of majority. The custodian must maintain 431 an exemption granted pursuant to sub-subparagraph 2.z. until the 432 qualifying conditions for the exemption no longer apply to the 433 person subject to the exemption. 434 4.a.âA county property appraiser, as defined in s. 435 192.001(3), or a county tax collector, as defined in s. 436 192.001(4), who receives a written and notarized request for 437 maintenance of the exemption pursuant to subparagraph 3. must 438 comply by removing the name of the individual with exempt status 439 and the instrument number or Official Records book and page 440 number identifying the property with the exempt status from all 441 publicly available records maintained by the property appraiser 442 or tax collector. For written requests received on or before 443 July 1, 2021, a county property appraiser or county tax 444 collector must comply with this sub-subparagraph by October 1, 445 2021. A county property appraiser or county tax collector may 446 not remove the street address, legal description, or other 447 information identifying real property within the agencyâs 448 records so long as a name or personal information otherwise 449 exempt from inspection and copying pursuant to this section is 450 not associated with the property or otherwise displayed in the 451 public records of the agency. 452 b.âAny information restricted from public display, 453 inspection, or copying under sub-subparagraph a. must be 454 provided to the individual whose information was removed. 455 5.âAn officer, an employee, a justice, a judge, or other 456 person specified in subparagraph 2. may submit a written request 457 for the release of his or her exempt information to the 458 custodial agency. The written request must be notarized and must 459 specify the information to be released and the party authorized 460 to receive the information. Upon receipt of the written request, 461 the custodial agency must release the specified information to 462 the party authorized to receive such information. 463 6.âThe exemptions in this paragraph apply to information 464 held by an agency before, on, or after the effective date of the 465 exemption. 466 7.âInformation made exempt under this paragraph may be 467 disclosed pursuant to s. 28.2221 to a title insurer authorized 468 pursuant to s. 624.401 and its affiliates as defined in s. 469 624.10; a title insurance agent or title insurance agency as 470 defined in s. 626.841(1) or (2), respectively; or an attorney 471 duly admitted to practice law in this state and in good standing 472 with The Florida Bar. 473 8.âThe exempt status of a home address contained in the 474 Official Records is maintained only during the period when a 475 protected party resides at the dwelling location. Upon 476 conveyance of real property after October 1, 2021, and when such 477 real property no longer constitutes a protected partyâs home 478 address as defined in sub-subparagraph 1.a., the protected party 479 must submit a written request to release the removed information 480 to the county recorder. The written request to release the 481 removed information must be notarized, must confirm that a 482 protected partyâs request for release is pursuant to a 483 conveyance of his or her dwelling location, and must specify the 484 Official Records book and page, instrument number, or clerkâs 485 file number for each document containing the information to be 486 released. 487 9.âUpon the death of a protected party as verified by a 488 certified copy of a death certificate or court order, any party 489 can request the county recorder to release a protected 490 decedentâs removed information unless there is a related request 491 on file with the county recorder for continued removal of the 492 decedentâs information or unless such removal is otherwise 493 prohibited by statute or by court order. The written request to 494 release the removed information upon the death of a protected 495 party must attach the certified copy of a death certificate or 496 court order and must be notarized, must confirm the request for 497 release is due to the death of a protected party, and must 498 specify the Official Records book and page number, instrument 499 number, or clerkâs file number for each document containing the 500 information to be released. A fee may not be charged for the 501 release of any document pursuant to such request. 502 Section 2.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 503 744.21031, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 504 744.21031âPublic records exemption.â 505 (1)âFor purposes of this section, the term: 506 (c)ââTelephone numbersâ has the same meaning as provided in 507 s. 119.071(4)(d)1.d s. 119.071(4)(d)1.c. 508 Section 3.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 509 necessity that the home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone 510 numbers of current state attorneyâs office and Office of 511 Statewide Prosecution nonlegal support staff; the names, home 512 addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of 513 employment of the spouses and children of such nonlegal support 514 staff; and the names and locations of schools and day care 515 facilities attended by the children of such nonlegal support 516 staff be made exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 517 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution. Such personal 518 identifying and location information can be used as a tool to 519 perpetrate fraud against an individual or to acquire sensitive 520 personal, financial, medical, and familial information, the 521 release of which could cause great financial harm to the 522 individual. Current state attorneyâs office and Office of 523 Statewide Prosecution nonlegal support staff, in the course of 524 their employment, may assist in the review of criminal 525 prosecution cases; assist assistant state attorneys and 526 assistant statewide prosecutors; maintain contact with victims, 527 witnesses, criminal defense attorneys, judicial assistants, and 528 law enforcement; and possess and handle sensitive criminal 529 justice information and personal identifiable information, such 530 as biometric data, identity history data, biographic data, 531 property data, and case or incident history data, under strict 532 security protocols. Such nonlegal support staff may incur the 533 ill will of litigants, the accused, the convicted, and their 534 associates and families, thus making nonlegal support staff and 535 their spouses and children targets for acts of revenge. If such 536 identifying and location information is released, the safety of 537 current nonlegal support staff and their spouses and children 538 could be jeopardized. For these reasons, the Legislature finds 539 that it is a public necessity that such information be made 540 exempt from public records requirements. 541 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.